New York, session 2025-2026, A780.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Supervis- 2 ing Upcoming Professionals for Practice in Official Roles in Therapy 3 (SUPPORT) act". 4 § 2. Paragraph (c) of subdivision 2 of section 7704 of the education 5 law, as amended by chapter 130 of the laws of 2010, is amended to read 6 as follows: 7 (c) Experience: have at least three years full-time supervised post- 8 graduate clinical social work experience in diagnosis, psychotherapy, 9 and assessment-based treatment plans, or its part-time equivalent, 10 obtained over a continuous period not to exceed six years, under the 11 supervision, satisfactory to the department, of a psychiatrist, a 12 licensed psychologist, [or] a licensed clinical social worker in a 13 facility setting or other supervised settings approved by the department 14 or a mental health practitioner who has been granted the privilege to 15 diagnose and develop assessment-based treatment plans under article one 16 hundred sixty-three of this title. Satisfactory experience obtained in 17 an entity operating under a waiver issued by the department pursuant to 18 section sixty-five hundred three-a of this title may be accepted by the 19 department, notwithstanding that such experience may have been obtained 20 prior to the effective date of such section sixty-five hundred three-a 21 and/or prior to the entity having obtained a waiver. The department may, 22 for good cause shown, accept satisfactory experience that was obtained 23 in a setting that would have been eligible for a waiver but which has EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00963-01-5 A. 780 2 1 not obtained a waiver from the department or experience that was 2 obtained in good faith by the applicant under the belief that appropri- 3 ate authorization had been obtained for the experience, provided that 4 such experience meets all other requirements for acceptable experience; 5 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.